Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3404
Policies; applicability of sections.

Sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 shall apply to all policies, except:

(1) Any policy which is a security subject to federal jurisdiction;

(2) Any group policy covering a group of one thousand or more lives at date of issue, other than a group credit life insurance policy or a group credit accident and health insurance policy, but this shall not exempt any individual certificate issued under a group policy delivered or issued for delivery in this state;

(3) Any group annuity contract which funds a pension, profit-sharing, or deferred compensation plan;

(4) Any form used in connection with, as a conversion from, as an addition to, or in exchange under, a contractual provision for a policy delivered or issued for delivery on a form approved or permitted to be issued before the dates such forms must be approved under sections 44-3401 to 44-3408; or

(5) The renewal of a policy delivered or issued for delivery before the dates such forms must be approved under sections 44-3401 to 44-3408.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 4.